District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.06

Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups of one or more directors. The terms of office and number of directors in each group do not need to be uniform.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History